Washington statutes.
RCW 19.170.030

Disclosures required.

(1) The offer must identify the name and address of the promoter and the sponsor of the promotion.

(2) The offer must state the verifiable retail value of each prize offered in it.

(3)(a) If an element of chance is involved, each offer must state the odds the participant has of being awarded each prize. The odds must be expressed in Arabic numerals, in ratio form, based on the total number of prizes to be awarded and the total number of offers distributed.

(b) If the promotion identified in the offer is part of a collective promotion with more than one participating sponsor, that fact must be clearly and conspicuously disclosed.

(c) The odds must be stated in a manner that will not deceive or mislead a person about that person's chance of being awarded a prize.

(4) The verifiable retail value and odds for each prize must be stated in immediate proximity on the same page with the first listing of each prize in type at least as large as the typeface used in the standard text of the offer.

(5) If a person is required or invited to view, hear, or attend a sales presentation in order to claim a prize that has been awarded, may have been awarded, or will be awarded, the requirement or invitation must be conspicuously disclosed under subsection (7) of this section to the person in the offer in boldface type at least as large as the typeface used in the standard text of the offer.

(6) No item in an offer may be denominated a prize, gift, award, premium, or similar term that implies the item is free if, in order to receive the item or use the item for its intended purpose the intended recipient is required to spend any sum of money, including but not limited to shipping fees, deposits, handling fees, payment for one item in order to receive another at no charge, or the purchase of another item or the expenditure of funds in order to make meaningful use of the item awarded in the promotion. The payment of any applicable state or federal taxes by a recipient directly to a government entity is not a violation of this section.

(7) If the receipt of the prize is contingent upon certain restrictions or qualifications that the recipient must meet, or if the use or availability of the prize is restricted or qualified in any way, including, but not limited to restrictions on travel dates, travel times, classes of travel, airlines, accommodations, travel agents, or tour operators, the restrictions or qualifications must be disclosed on the offer in immediate proximity on the same page with the first listing of the prize in type at least as large as the typeface used in the standard text of the offer or, in place thereof, the following statement printed in direct proximity to the prize or prizes awarded in type at least as large as the typeface used in the standard text of the offer:

"Details and qualifications for participation in this promotion may apply."

This statement must be followed by a disclosure, in the same size type as the statement, indicating where in the offer the restrictions may be found. The restrictions must be printed in type at least as large as the typeface used in the standard text of the offer.

(8) If a prize will not be awarded or given unless a winning ticket, the offer itself, a token, number, lot, or other device used to determine winners in a particular promotion is presented to a promoter or a sponsor, this fact must be clearly stated on the first page of the offer.

[ 1999 c 31 s 1; 1991 c 227 s 3.]